New York, session 2025-2026, A7869.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph b of subdivision 1 of section 6807 of the educa- 2 tion law, as amended by chapter 538 of the laws of 2001, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 b. Any physician, dentist, veterinarian or other licensed health care 5 provider legally authorized to prescribe drugs under this title who is 6 not the owner of a pharmacy or who is not in the employ of such owner, 7 from supplying [his] their patients with such drugs as the physician, 8 dentist, veterinarian or other licensed health care provider legally 9 authorized to prescribe drugs under this title deems proper in 10 connection with [his] their practice, provided, however, that all such 11 drugs shall be dispensed in a container labeled with the name and 12 address of the dispenser and patient, directions for use, [and] date of 13 delivery, and symptom or purpose for which the drug is being prescribed 14 if the patient requests such information be disclosed on the label to 15 the health care provider with the exception of off label prescription 16 use, and in addition, such drug shall bear a label containing the 17 proprietary or brand name of the drug and, if applicable, the strength 18 of the contents, unless the person issuing the prescription specifically 19 states on the prescription in [his] their own handwriting, that the name 20 of the drug and the strength thereof should not appear on the label; 21 provided further that if such drugs are controlled substances, they 22 shall be dispensed pursuant to the requirements of article thirty-three 23 of the public health law; 24 § 2. Section 6810 of the education law is amended by adding a new 25 subdivision 1-b to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10810-02-5 A. 7869 2 1 1-b. Upon the patient's request to the practitioner, the prescription 2 label shall include the symptom or purpose for which the drug is being 3 prescribed with the exception of off label prescription use. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 5 law.